District of Columbia statutes.
7-171

Chief Clerk and Chief Inspector not to act as deputy.

After April 2, 1938, neither the Chief Clerk nor the Chief Inspector of the Department of Human Services of the District of Columbia shall act as a deputy to the Director of the Department of Human Services of said District.

July 14, 1892, 27 Stat. 162, ch. 171, § 1
April 2, 1938, 52 Stat. 153, ch. 60
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.
1973 Ed., § 6-108.
1981 Ed., § 6-107.